Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1249
Bridges; joint construction; joint management and control.

Whenever the electors of any metropolitan city shall have authorized the construction of a bridge as provided in section 14-1201, the governing body of the city shall have power to construct such bridge independently or jointly with any state or political unit as authorized in section 14-1202. Such cities are authorized to enter into any contract which may be necessary to effectuate this purpose. The title to all property acquired shall vest in the political units cooperating as tenants in common. The actual control of all construction and subsequent operation, including all property necessary to the completed bridge, and all maintenance and repair thereof, and all funds and the collection and custody of tolls shall vest in a joint bridge commission as provided in section 14-1244, which commission and its control shall not be terminated until such tenancy in common shall be terminated.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 25, p. 631;

C.S.1929, § 14-1225;

R.S.1943, § 14-1249.